INDEXER_files_2.8/FUZZY/ru.aff
SFX J Y 37
SFX J   ь    я            ь
SFX J   ь    ем           ь
SFX J   ь    е            ь
SFX J   ь    ю            ь
SFX J   о    у            о
SFX J   о    е            о
SFX J   о    а            о
SFX J   й    я            й
SFX J   й    и            ий
SFX J   й    ем           й
SFX J   й    е            [^и]й
SFX J   й    ю            й
SFX J   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX J   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX J   е    и            ие
SFX J   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX J   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX J   ёж   ежу          ёж
SFX J   ёж   еже          ёж
SFX J   ёж   ежа          ёж
SFX J   ё    я            ё
SFX J   ё    е            ьё
SFX J   ё    ю            ё
SFX J   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX J   0    у            [^ёейожь]
SFX J   0    у            [^ё]ж
SFX J   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX J   0    ом           [^ёцейожьшщч]
SFX J   0    м            о
SFX J   0    м            е
SFX J   0    м            [ёе]
SFX J   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX J   0    е            [^ёейожь]
SFX J   0    е            [^ё]ж
SFX J   0    а            [^ейоь]
SFX J   0    а            [^ёейожь]
SFX J   0    а            [^ё]ж

SFX I Y 30
SFX I   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX I   ька  ек           ька
SFX I   я    ь            [аеиояуы]ня
SFX I   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX I   я    и            я
SFX I   я    ей           я
SFX I   я    ею           я
SFX I   я    е            [^и]я
SFX I   я    ю            я
SFX I   ня   ен           [^аеийояуьыз]ня
SFX I   ка   ок           [^юацеийояужьышч]ка
SFX I   ка   к            [юаеиояуы]ка
SFX I   ка   ек           [цжшч]ка
SFX I   йня  ен           йня
SFX I   йка  ек           йка
SFX I   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX I   а    у            а
SFX I   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX I   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX I   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX I   а    ей           [цшщч]а
SFX I   а    ею           [цшщч]а
SFX I   а    е            а
SFX I   а    0            [^к]а
SFX I   0    ми           я
SFX I   0    ми           а
SFX I   0    м            я
SFX I   0    м            а
SFX I   0    х            я
SFX I   0    х            а

SFX H Y 14
SFX H   я    и            я
SFX H   я    ей           я
SFX H   я    ею           я
SFX H   я    е            [^и]я
SFX H   я    ю            я
SFX H   й    ю            [ео]й
SFX H   а    ы            [^гхкжшщч]а
SFX H   а    у            а
SFX H   а    ой           [^цжшщч]а
SFX H   а    ою           [^цжшщч]а
SFX H   а    и            [гхкжшщч]а
SFX H   а    ей           ща
SFX H   а    ею           ща
SFX H   а    е            а

SFX G Y 52
SFX G   ый   ому          ый
SFX G   ый   ом           ый
SFX G   ый   ого          ый
SFX G   ьня  ен           ьня
SFX G   ь    ями          ь
SFX G   ь    ям           ь
SFX G   ь    ях           ь
SFX G   ь    я            ь
SFX G   ь    и            ь
SFX G   ь    ем           ь
SFX G   ь    ей           ь
SFX G   ь    е            ь
SFX G   ь    ю            ь
SFX G   ь    ём           ь
SFX G   я    ь            [аеиоуы]ня
SFX G   я    й            [еиу]я
SFX G   я    и            я
SFX G   я    ей           я
SFX G   я    ею           я
SFX G   я    е            [^и]я
SFX G   я    ю            я
SFX G   я    ёй           я
SFX G   я    ёю           я
SFX G   ок   ку           ок
SFX G   ок   ком          ок
SFX G   ок   ке           ок
SFX G   ок   ка           ок
SFX G   ой   им           ой
SFX G   ня   ен           [^аеийоуьыз]ня
SFX G   йня  ен           йня
SFX G   й    му           ой
SFX G   й    м            ый
SFX G   й    м            ой
SFX G   й    м            ий
SFX G   й    го           ой
SFX G   ий   ому          ий
SFX G   ий   ом           ий
SFX G   ий   ого          ий
SFX G   ек   ку           ек
SFX G   ек   ком          ек
SFX G   ек   ке           ек
SFX G   ек   ка           ек
SFX G   ец   цу           ец
SFX G   ец   це           ец
SFX G   ец   ца           ец
SFX G   0    ым           [^цейкояжьшщч]
SFX G   0    у            [^цейкояь]
SFX G   0    ми           я
SFX G   0    м            я
SFX G   0    х            я
SFX G   0    е            [^цейкояь]
SFX G   0    а            [^цейкояь]

SFX F Y 25
SFX F   ь    и            ь
SFX F   онок атами        онок
SFX F   онок атам         онок
SFX F   онок атах         онок
SFX F   онок ата          онок
SFX F   онок ат           онок
SFX F   ок   ку           нок
SFX F   ок   ком          нок
SFX F   ок   ке           нок
SFX F   ок   ка           нок
SFX F   енок ятами        енок
SFX F   енок ятам         енок
SFX F   енок ятах         енок
SFX F   енок ята          енок
SFX F   енок ят           енок
SFX F   ая   ую           ая
SFX F   ая   ой           ая
SFX F   а    у            а
SFX F   а    ой           а
SFX F   ёнок ятами        ёнок
SFX F   ёнок ятам         ёнок
SFX F   ёнок ятах         ёнок
SFX F   ёнок ята          ёнок
SFX F   ёнок ят           ёнок
SFX F   0    ю            ь

SFX E Y 15
SFX E   ый   ей           ый
SFX E   ый   ее           ый
SFX E   ь    я            ь
SFX E   ь    ем           ь
SFX E   ь    е            ь
SFX E   ь    ю            ь
SFX E   ь    ём           ь
SFX E   я    и            я
SFX E   я    ей           я
SFX E   я    ею           я
SFX E   я    е            [^и]я
SFX E   я    ю            я
SFX E   я    ёй           я
SFX E   я    ёю           я
SFX E   е    й            ее

SFX D Y 5
SFX D   ься  ся           иться
SFX D   ться ется         [ая]ться
SFX D   ться ются         [ая]ться
SFX D   иться ятся         [^жшщч]иться
SFX D   иться атся         [жшщч]иться

SFX B Y 25
SFX B   ыться ойтесь       ыться
SFX B   ыться ойся         ыться
SFX B   ыть  ойте         ыть
SFX B   ыть  ой           ыть
SFX B   ь    е            ить
SFX B   уться итесь        уться
SFX B   уться ись          уться
SFX B   уть  ите          уть
SFX B   уть  и            уть
SFX B   ться тесь         иться
SFX B   ться сь           иться
SFX B   ться йтесь        [аея]ться
SFX B   ться йся          [аея]ться
SFX B   ть   йте          [аея]ть
SFX B   ть   й            [аея]ть
SFX B   сь   тесь         ись
SFX B   ся   тесь         йся
SFX B   ся   тесь         [^т]ься
SFX B   оться итесь        оться
SFX B   оться ись          оться
SFX B   оть  ите          оть
SFX B   оть  и            оть
SFX B   ить  и            ить
SFX B   0    те           [ий]
SFX B   0    те           [^ст]ь
